Delaware, session 153, HB295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4179, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4179. Stopping, standing standing, or parking. (e) No person shall may stop, stand stand, or park a vehicle, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or traffic-control device, including all state-owned and/or and state leased property; in any of the following places: (19) In any area owned by, leased by or under the control of the State, when such area has been designated by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget as a reserved parking space for members of the General Assembly, their staff, state-owned vehicles, specific state offices offices, or state employees. employees, unless the person is the person or in the class of persons for whom the parking space is reserved. Such parking spaces will be conspicuously marked as such; (20) In any area designated by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget as a reserved parking space under Â§ 6309A of Title 29, unless the person is the person or in the class of persons for whom the parking space is reserved; (20) (21) In any areas area which in any manner restricts access to or ingress or egress from the areas defined in paragraph (19) or (20) of this subsection. (i) A violation of paragraph 20 or 21, with respect to paragraph 20, of this subsection is not subject to a civil penalty under Â§ 4178 of this title. Section 2. Amend Â§ 6309A, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6309A. Human Resources Management [Repealed]. Designated Parking Space. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget must designate 1 or more reserved parking spaces for a veteran as defined in Â§ 8811 of this title at the following locations or a successor location that serves the same function: (1) Delaware City Division of Motor Vehicles. (2) Greater Wilmington Division of Motor Vehicles. (3) Dover Division of Motor Vehicles. (4) Georgetown Division of Motor Vehicles. (5) Appoquinimink State Service Center. (6) Belvedere State Service Center. (7) Claymont State Service Center. (8) DeLaWarr State Service Center. (9) Floyd I. Hudson State Service Center. (10) Northeast State Service Center. (11) Winder Laird Porter State Service Center. (12) Division of Social Servicesâ Canby Park Office. (13) Churchmanâs Corporate Center. (14) Robscott Building. (15) James W. Williams State Service Center. (16) Blue Hen Corporate Center. (17) Smyrna State Service Center. (18) Bridgeville State Service Center. (19) Edward W. Pyle State Service Center. (20) Laurel State Service Center. (21) Milford State Services Center Campus. (22) Thurman Adams State Service Center. (23) Anna C. Shipley State Service Center. Section 3. This Act takes effect 6 months after its enactment into law.